Nevada, session 83, AB312.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 113 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Before the date of closing in a real estate transaction, a
seller of real property that includes a private well shall disclose, in
writing, to the purchaser the results of a test which concerns the
quality of the water in the private well. The results of the test must
indicate:
-
*AB312*

– 2 –
(a) Whether the water in the private well complies with the
standards of water quality established by the State Environmental
Commission pursuant to NRS 445A.425; and
(b) The amounts of arsenic, cadmium, lead, mercury and zinc
in the water.
2. The test must be conducted:
(a) Within 90 days before the date of closing; and
(b) By a laboratory certified in accordance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 445A.425 and 445A.428.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Private well” means a well that is not a public water
system or part of a public water system.
(b) “Public water system” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 445A.235.
H
-
*AB312*